src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON RANES-plc !Ráneš:Rátnáhii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@      RANES-OBL       ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:ne%>X4š@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON RANES-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:neX4š     K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:neX7š     RHyph ; !
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:neX8š     RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgN:neX4š     RHyph ;
                  +Ess:neX4šin   K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:tnáX2ha   K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:tnáX2t    K     ; !
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:tnáX2t    RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgG:tnáX2ha   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:tnáX2ha   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:tnáX2t    K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:tnáX2hij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:tnáX2his  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:tnáX2hin  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:tnáX2hijn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:tnáX2hat K ;
!+Pl+Gen:tnáX2hijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:tnáX2hijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:tnáX2hijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:tnáX2hijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:tnáX2hijguin K ;

LEXICON CAVKKUS-plc !Čávkkus:Čávkohii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@   CAVKKUS-OBL     ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@us DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON CAVKKUS-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:kus   K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:kos   RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgN:kus   RHyph ;
                  +Ess:kusin K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:oha   K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ot    K     ; !
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:ot    RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgG:oha   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:oha   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:ot    K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:ohij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:ohis  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:ohin  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ohijn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:ohat K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ohijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ohijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ohijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ohijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ohijguin K ;

LEXICON GATA-plc
      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gata  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG  ;
      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gaten LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+ABBR+Sem/Plc:gt    #                  ;

LEXICON ANAR-ani
           +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>               ANARDECL   ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/Dimin:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ANAR-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>               ANARDECL   ;
       +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ažž PLACE-DIMV ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@    #          ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ANAR-fem
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>               ANARDECL   ;
       +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ažž PLACE-DIMV ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@    #          ; !

LEXICON ANAR-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ;
         @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2  ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3  ; !

LEXICON ANAR
 +N+Prop:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
   ANAR-OBL ;

LEXICON ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
   ANAR-OBL_PLC-ORG ;



LEXICON ANAR-OBL
         +Attr+Use/Sub:       K     ; !
               +Sg+Nom:       K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7     RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgN:       RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:       RProp ;
                  +Ess:in     K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:a      K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:       K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2     RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:X2a    RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:a      K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:       K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:ij     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:is     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:in     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:at     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:ijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:ijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:ijdda  K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:ijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:ijguin K     ;

LEXICON ANAR-OBL_PLC-ORG
         +Attr+Use/Sub:    K     ; !
               +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7  RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp ;
                  +Ess:in  K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:a   K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:    K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2  RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:X2a RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:a   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:    K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:ij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:is  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:in  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ijn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ijguin K ;


LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            HEANDARATDECL ;
       +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž        PLACE-DIMDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #             ; !

LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            HEANDARATDECL ;
       +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>aX6ž        PLACE-DIMDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #             ; !

LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>             HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@  DenominalAdjsC2       ;
           @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@  DenominalAdjsC3       ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:aX4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT                ;

LEXICON HEANDARATDECL ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
   HEANDARAT-OBL ;

LEXICON HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
   HEANDARAT-OBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-OBL
         +Attr+Use/Sub:         K     ; !
               +Sg+Nom:         K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:         RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:         RProp ;
               +Sg+Gen:aX4      K     ;
               +Sg+Acc:aX4      K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:aX3j     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:aX4s     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:aX4n     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:aX5jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:aX4t     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:aX5jd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:aX5jd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:aX5jde   K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:aX5jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K     ;
                  +Ess:an       K     ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-OBL_PLC-ORG
         +Attr+Use/Sub:      K     ; !
               +Sg+Nom:      K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:      RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:      RProp ;
               +Sg+Gen:aX4   K     ;
               +Sg+Acc:aX4   K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:aX3j  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:aX4s  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:aX4n  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:aX5jn K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:aX4t  K     ;
!+Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
                  +Ess:an    K     ;


LEXICON GEAVNNIS-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>              GEAVNNISDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@X4 #            ; !

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG ;
         @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2      ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3      ; !

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
   GEAVNNIS-OBL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG
   GEAVNNIS-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
